New Jersey, session 221, S1382.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding any provision of law or regulation to the contrary, when an oversized vehicle or combination of vehicles receives a special written permit pursuant to subsection d. of R.S.39:3-84, the vehicle or combination of vehicles is required to be accompanied by one or more escort vehicles, and the vehicle or combination of vehicles is required to be accompanied by an additional escort vehicle when traveling during the nighttime hours of sunset to sunrise, then the vehicle or combination of vehicles shall not be required to be accompanied by the additional escort vehicle during such nighttime hours if the load transported by the vehicle or combination of vehicles is illuminated with additional lighting so as to be clearly visible from 1,000 feet in all directions of traffic. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.